test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv37_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    negl+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: negl
    negl+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: negl
    negl+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: negl
    negl+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: neglar
    negl+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: [negl, neglir]
    negl+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: neglum
    negl+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: negla
    negl+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: neglin
    negl+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: neglina
    negl+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: neglini
    negl+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: neglarinnar
    negl+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: [neglinar, neglirnar]
    negl+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: neglunum
    negl+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: neglanna
